Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2526.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3118. Automated litter enforcement systems in public rights-of-way and highways.(a) Establishment.--Subject to the requirements of this section, the department, commission or a municipality may establish and use automated litter enforcement systems in public rights-of-way and highways to enforce littering violations in litter enforcement zones.(b) Authorization.--(1) The department may authorize the use of an automated litter enforcement system on any State-designated highway.(2) The commission may authorize the use of an automated 12345678910111213141516171819 litter enforcement system on any portion of the Pennsylvania Turnpike.(3) Subject to subsection (c), a municipality may authorize the use of an automated litter enforcement system on any highway under the jurisdiction of the municipality.(c) Municipal requirements.--Prior to the use of an automated litter enforcement system in a litter enforcement zone under the jurisdiction of a municipality and except as provided in subsection (d), the municipality shall:(1) Enact a local ordinance authorizing the general use of automated litter enforcement systems in a litter enforcement zone under the jurisdiction of the municipality.(2) Transmit a copy of the ordinance to the department.(3) Provide a statement of policy to the department outlining the criteria the municipality will use when determining litter enforcement zones for the use of an automated litter enforcement system.(4) Provide documentation to the department, as determined by the department, demonstrating all of the following:(i) That the automated litter enforcement system complies with this section and has been approved by the department under subsection (o).(ii) That the municipality will comply with this section.(iii) That the system administrator, if applicable, on the municipality's behalf, will comply with this section.(5) Provide documentation that the municipality has entered into an agreement with a police department for the 20260HB2526PN3425 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 review of violations in accordance with subsection (k).(6) Receive approval from the department to operate an automated litter enforcement system in a litter enforcement zone under the jurisdiction of the municipality.(d) Exception.--If the department or the commission authorizes the use of an automated litter enforcement system in a litter enforcement zone that includes both a highway under the jurisdiction of the department or the commission and a local highway under the jurisdiction of a municipality, the department or the commission may use the automated litter enforcement system in the litter enforcement zone regardless of whether the municipality has been approved to operate an automated litter enforcement system under subsection (c).(e) Construction.--Subsection (c) shall not be construed to require a municipality to identify each litter enforcement zone on the specific highway the municipality intends to use an automated litter enforcement system or require the municipality to receive prior approval for each litter enforcement zone in which the municipality intends to use an automated litter enforcement system.(f) Litter enforcement zone requirements.--Not less than one warning sign shall be conspicuously placed before and after the litter enforcement zone, in both directions of traffic, notifying the public that an automated litter enforcement system is in use. The signs shall:(1) Be in conformance with Federal regulations and be of a size and design determined by the department.(2) Clearly and accurately indicate if the automated litter enforcement system is active and in use.(g) Violations.--A motor vehicle that deposits waste and 20260HB2526PN3425 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other material on highways, property or waters and is identified by an automated litter enforcement system violates this section and shall be subject to penalties under subsection (i).(h) Owner liability.--For each violation under subsection (g), the owner of the motor vehicle shall be liable for the penalty imposed under subsection (i) unless the owner has a defense under subsection (n). For the purposes of this section, the lessee of a leased vehicle shall be considered the owner of a motor vehicle.(i) Penalties.--An individual in violation of subsection (g) shall be subject to penalties in accordance with the following:(1) A violation under this section shall constitute a fine of $200.(2) The fine shall not be subject to 42 Pa.C.S. §§ 3571 (relating to Commonwealth portion of fines, etc.) and 3573 (relating to municipal corporation portion of fines, etc.), or any other surcharges or fines not specifically authorized by this section.(3) A penalty imposed under this section shall not:(i) Be deemed a criminal conviction.(ii) Be made part of the operating record of the individual upon whom the penalty is imposed under section 1535 (relating to schedule of convictions and points).(iii) Be the subject of merit rating for insurance purposes.(iv) Authorize imposition of surcharge points in the provision of motor vehicle insurance coverage.(j) Notice of violation.--A notice of violation shall be sent to the owner of a vehicle in violation of subsection (g) in accordance with the following:20260HB2526PN3425 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) An action to enforce this section shall be initiated by a notice of violation to the owner of a motor vehicle identified by an automated litter enforcement system. A notice of violation based upon inspection of recorded images produced by an automated litter enforcement system and sworn or affirmed by a police officer in accordance with subsection (l) shall be prima facie evidence of the facts contained in the notice.(2) The notice of violation shall include written verification that the automated litter enforcement system was operating correctly at the time of the alleged violation and the date of the most recent inspection, which shall be prima facie evidence.(3) The automated litter enforcement system operator shall complete training offered by the manufacturer or vendor of the automated litter enforcement system, including training on any devices critical to the operation of the system, or the manufacturer's or vendor's representative in the procedures for setting up, testing and operating an automated litter enforcement system. Upon completion of the training, the manufacturer or vendor, or manufacturer's or vendor's representative, shall issue a signed certificate to the automated litter enforcement system operator which shall be admitted as evidence in any court proceeding for a violation involving an automated litter enforcement system. An automated litter enforcement system operator shall fill out and sign a daily log for an automated litter enforcement system which:(i) states the date, time and location of the system setup;20260HB2526PN3425 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) states that the automated litter enforcement system operator successfully performed and the automated litter enforcement system passed the self-tests specified by the manufacturer or vendor of the automated litter enforcement system;(iii) shall be kept on file; and(iv) shall be admitted in any proceeding for a violation involving an automated litter enforcement system.(4) An automated litter enforcement system shall undergo an annual calibration check performed by a calibration laboratory. The calibration laboratory shall issue a signed certificate of calibration after the annual calibration check, which shall be kept on file and shall be admitted as evidence in any proceeding for a violation involving an automated litter enforcement system.(5) The following shall be attached to the notice of violation:(i) A copy of the recorded image showing the motor vehicle with its license plate visible.(ii) The registration number and state of issuance of the motor vehicle registration.(iii) A verification statement that the automated litter enforcement system was operating correctly at the time of the alleged violation.(iv) A statement that lists the date of the most recent inspection shall be prima facie evidence that the automated litter enforcement system was operating properly.(v) The date, time and place of the alleged 20260HB2526PN3425 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 violation.(vi) A reference to this section.(vii) Instructions for return of the notice of violation.(6) In the case of a violation involving a motor vehicle subject to the laws of this Commonwealth, the notice of violation shall be mailed within 30 days after the commission of the violation or within 30 days after the discovery of the identity of the owner, whichever is later, to the address of the owner as listed in the records of the department.(7) In the case of a violation involving a motor vehicle from a jurisdiction other than this Commonwealth, the notice of violation shall be mailed within 30 days after the discovery of the identity of the owner to the address of the owner as listed in the records of the official in the jurisdiction having charge of the registration of the vehicle.(8) A notice of violation shall be invalid unless provided to the owner within 90 days of the offense.(9) The notice of violation shall include the following text:This notice shall be returned personally, by mail or by an agent duly authorized in writing, within 30 days of the mailing date of the notice. A hearing may be obtained upon the written request of the owner.(10) Notice of violation must be sent by first class mail. A manual or automatic record of mailing prepared by the system administrator in the ordinary course of business shall be prima facie evidence of mailing and shall be admissible in a judicial or administrative proceeding as to the facts 20260HB2526PN3425 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contained in the notice.(k) Agreements.--(1) The department, the commission or a municipality may enter into an agreement with a system administrator to initiate actions to enforce this section through an automated litter enforcement system.(2) An agreement entered into under paragraph (1) by a municipality shall be approved by a vote of the governing body of the municipality. The meeting to consider approval of an automated litter enforcement system shall be properly noticed under 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings).(3) A municipality may only enforce this section if the municipality has a written intergovernmental agreement with a primary police department.(4) The department or the commission may only enforce this section if the department or the commission has a written intergovernmental agreement with the Pennsylvania State Police.(5) Compensation under an agreement authorized under paragraph (1) shall not require a minimum or maximum number of violations to be issued that would impact the compensation to the system administrator.(6) The department, the commission or a municipality, or the system administrator on their behalf, shall provide notice of violation through a publicly accessible Internet website that provides guidance and information related to the system, including the appeals process and contact information. The publicly accessible Internet website shall remain publicly accessible throughout the period of use of the automated litter enforcement system.20260HB2526PN3425 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) The department, the commission or a municipality, or the system administrator on their behalf, shall establish an electronic system where program information and all notices of violations, in conformance with this section, can be accessed and viewed by:(i) The primary police department.(ii) The department's hearing officer for conducting appeals.(8) The department, the commission or a municipality, or the system administrator on their behalf, may utilize an alternative system to share program information and all notices of violations if the electronic system is unavailable for any legitimate purpose.(9) The department may randomly conduct audits of a municipality or a system administrator to ensure compliance with this section as determined by the department. If the department conducts an audit, the department shall prepare a summary of the audit, which shall be posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(l) Police review.--(1) A notice of violation, including a facsimile of a notice of violation, based upon inspection of recorded images produced by an automated litter enforcement system and sworn to or affirmed by a police department shall be prima facie evidence of the facts contained in it. The department, the commission or a municipality, or the system administrator on their behalf, must include written documentation that the automated litter enforcement system was operating correctly at the time of the alleged violation in order to enforce the violation. A recorded image evidencing a violation of this 20260HB2526PN3425 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section shall be admissible in any judicial or administrative proceeding to adjudicate the liability for the violation of this section.(2) The department, the commission or a municipality, or the system administrator on their behalf, shall submit the following information regarding a violation of this section to the primary police department using an electronic system:(i) A copy of the recorded image or images showing the motor vehicle allegedly violating this section.(ii) The license plate number and state of issuance of the motor vehicle.(iii) The date, time and place of the alleged violation.(3) Upon receipt of violation information under paragraph (2), a primary police department shall:(i) Review submitted evidence to determine if a violation under this section occurred and electronically certify the notice of violation.(ii) Notify the entity that submitted the violation of the electronic certification of the notice of violation related to the primary police department's capacity to view and authorize the notice.(iii) Restrict the review of submitted evidence under subparagraph (i) to an individual who is a police officer.(m) Limitations.--(1) Recorded images collected as part of the automated litter enforcement system may record only violations of this section and may not be used for any other surveillance purposes. The restrictions provided in this paragraph shall 20260HB2526PN3425 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 not preclude a court of competent jurisdiction from issuing an order directing that the information be provided to law enforcement officials, if the information is requested solely in connection with a criminal law enforcement action and is reasonably described.(2) Information gathered and maintained under this section that is kept by the Commonwealth or a municipality, its authorized agents or its employees, including recorded images, written records, motor vehicle information, reports or facsimiles, names and addresses, shall be for the exclusive purpose of discharging its duties under this section. The information shall not be deemed a public record under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law. The information shall not be discoverable by court order or otherwise or be admissible as evidence in a proceeding except to determine liability under this section. The restrictions provided in this paragraph shall not preclude a court of competent jurisdiction from issuing an order directing that the information be provided to law enforcement officials if the information is requested solely in connection with a criminal law enforcement action and is reasonably described.(3) Recorded images obtained through the use of automated litter enforcement systems deployed as a means of promoting traffic safety in litter enforcement zones shall be destroyed within one year of final disposition of a notice of violation, except that images subject to a court order under paragraph (1) or (2) shall be destroyed within two years after the date of the order, unless further extended by court order. The department, the commission, a municipality or the 20260HB2526PN3425 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 system administrator shall retain evidence that the records have been destroyed in accordance with this section.(4) Motor vehicle owner information obtained as a result of the operation of an automated litter enforcement system under this section shall be the exclusive property of the Commonwealth or a municipality and not the property of the system administrator, manufacturer or vendor of the automated litter enforcement system and may not be used for a purpose other than prescribed in this section.(5) An intentional violation of this subsection shall constitute a misdemeanor of the third degree punishable by a fine of $500. Each violation shall constitute a separate and distinct offense.(n) Defenses.--It shall be a defense to a violation under subsection (g) that the:(1) Motor vehicle was reported to a police department as stolen prior to the time the violation occurred and was not recovered prior to that time.(2) Person receiving the notice of violation was not the owner of the motor vehicle at the time of the offense.(3) Automated litter enforcement system being used to determine the violation was not in compliance with this section and any regulations established by the department with respect to testing for accuracy, certification or calibration.(4) Person named in the notice of the violation was not driving the motor vehicle at the time of the violation. The department or the system administrator may require the owner to submit evidence that the owner was not the driver at the time of the alleged violation. The owner of the motor vehicle 20260HB2526PN3425 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 may not be required to disclose the identity of the driver of the motor vehicle at the time of the violation.(o) Authority and duties.--(1) The department, in consultation with the commission, shall promulgate regulations for the certification and the use of automated litter enforcement systems in accordance with this section.(2) Municipalities that authorize the use of automated litter enforcement systems in litter enforcement zones under their respective jurisdictions shall comply with regulations promulgated by the department under this section.(3) In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this section, the department shall promulgate temporary regulations in accordance with the following:(i) The temporary regulations shall expire upon promulgation of final regulations.(ii) The department shall promulgate temporary regulations not subject to:(A) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(B) Section 204(b) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(C) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(iii) The department's authority to adopt temporary regulations shall expire three years after the effective date of this subparagraph. Regulations adopted after this period shall be promulgated as provided by law.20260HB2526PN3425 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) The department, the commission and a municipality shall serve directly or through a contracted private service with a manufacturer or vendor as the system administrator. Compensation under a contract authorized by this paragraph shall be based only upon the value of equipment and services provided or rendered in support of the automated litter enforcement system program and may not be based on the quantity of notices of violations issued or amount of fines imposed or generated.(5) The system administrator shall prepare and issue notices of violations.(p) Payment of fine.--(1) An owner of a motor vehicle may admit responsibility for the violation and pay the fine provided in the notice of violation personally, through an authorized agent, electronically or by mailing both payment and the notice of violation to the system administrator.(2) Payment by mail shall be made only by money order, credit card or check made payable to the Commonwealth, the commission, the municipality or the system administrator, as applicable.(3) Payment of the fine shall operate as a final disposition of the case.(4) If payment is not received within 90 days of the mailing of the notice of violation, the department, the commission or the municipality may request an applicable credit collection agency to resolve the payment amount owed.(q) Contentment of violation.--(1) An owner of a motor vehicle may, within 30 days of the mailing date of the notice, request a hearing to contest 20260HB2526PN3425 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 liability by appearing before the system administrator either personally or by an authorized agent or by sending a request on the prescribed form. A hearing to contest liability may be in person or be conducted through live-stream synchronous video conferencing or similar virtual presence technology.(2) The system administrator shall provide an appropriate form by which owners of the motor vehicles may challenge a notice of violation.(3) Upon receipt of a hearing request, the system administrator shall, in a timely manner, schedule the matter before a hearing officer designated by the department. Written notice of the date, time and place of hearing must be presented or sent by first class mail to the owner of the motor vehicle. The department shall conduct hearings for contests of violations under this section regardless of whether the violation was issued under an automated litter enforcement system administered by the department, the commission or a municipality.(4) The hearing shall be informal and in accordance with the department's procedural rules. The decision of the department's hearing officer shall be made within 45 days from the hearing date and shall be final, subject to the right of the owner of the motor vehicle to appeal the decision under paragraph (5).(5) If, within 45 days of issuance of the decision of the department's hearing officer, the owner of the motor vehicle requests in writing an appeal of the decision of the hearing officer, the owner of the motor vehicle shall file the notice of violation and supporting documents with the office of the magisterial district judge for the magisterial 20260HB2526PN3425 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 district where the violation occurred and a magisterial district judge shall hear and decide the matter de novo and shall be restricted to finding an owner liable or not liable for violating this section.(6) The commission or municipality, or the system administrator on the commission's or municipality's behalf, shall reimburse the department for the actual cost of the hearing officer designated under paragraph (3).(r) Revenue.--(1) Twenty five dollars of every fine collected for a violation of this section shall be provided to the primary police department that reviewed the submitted evidence for the violation.(2) After the disbursement of fine revenue under paragraph (1), fine revenue collected by a municipality, or by the system administrator on the municipality's behalf, shall be used to pay for the administration of the program and the system administrator's invoice costs. Any remaining revenue shall be used by the municipality for the litter cleanup and abatement of highways or bridges owned by the municipality.(3) After the disbursement of fine revenue under paragraph (1), fine revenue collected by the department or the commission, or by the system administrator on their behalf, shall be deposited into the appropriate restricted receipt account as specified under paragraph (4).(4) Two restricted receipt accounts are established in the General Fund for fines remitted under this section to the department and the commission, respectively. The system administrator of the department or the commission, if any, 20260HB2526PN3425 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall send an invoice to the department or the commission based, respectively, on services provided. The department or the commission shall use the appropriate restricted receipt account to pay for the administration of the program and the system administrator's invoice costs, if applicable. Remaining fines shall be allocated by the municipality for the litter cleanup and abatement of highways or bridges owned by the municipality.(s) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Automated litter enforcement system" or "system." A camera system installed in public rights-of-way and highways that is equipped with at least one camera and one computer that produces recorded video and two or more still images of a motor vehicle being used or operated in a manner that violates this section."Automated litter enforcement system operator." An individual who has completed training to perform procedures for setting up, testing, operating and logging an automated litter enforcement system."Commission." The Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission."Litter enforcement zone." Includes public rights-of-way and highways where the department, the commission or the municipality intends to use an automated litter enforcement system."Municipality." A city, borough or township."Notice of violation." A notice issued under and in accordance with subsection (j)."Owner." The registered owner of a motor vehicle as identified by department records.20260HB2526PN3425 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Primary police department." One of the following:(1) For a municipality, either of the following:(i) The police department of the municipality that has the authority to issue citations for violations of this title.(ii) The Pennsylvania State Police if the municipality does not have a police department with authority to issue citations for violations of this title, at the sole discretion of the Pennsylvania State Police.(2) For the department or the commission, the Pennsylvania State Police."System administrator." A person contracted with the department, the commission or a municipality that creates, owns or has a license or permission to sell, lease, distribute or administer an automated litter enforcement system, consistent with the requirements of this section, is under agreement with a municipality, the department or the commission to perform, but not be limited to, the following:(1) Provide for the installation, operation and maintenance of an automated litter enforcement system in a litter enforcement zone.(2) Administer the enforcement of a violation of this section through an automated litter enforcement system on the department's, the commission's or a municipality's behalf as permitted by this section, including maintaining and transmitting records, mailing violation notices, processing violations, collecting fines and administering contests of violations.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2526PN3425 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930